Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.920

Existing liabilities not affected.

The enactment of this chapter shall not have the effect of terminating, or in any way modifying, any liability, civil or criminal, which shall already be in existence on the date this chapter becomes effective.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 190 s 44.]